California, session 20252026, SB422.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14016 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:14016. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the board shall review recommendations from the current body of work in national and state-level developmental services policy reports and shall research and provide a report to the Governor and the Legislature including recommendations on the most compelling strategies for addressing the workforce shortage in California’s developmental services system. The report shall identify the state entities best suited for, and that have the jurisdiction and authority aligned with, implementing the identified workforce strategies.(b) (1) Before submitting the report required by subdivision (a), the board shall solicit input from all relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, people with developmental disabilities and their family members, direct support professionals, developmental services providers, the Association of Regional Center Agencies, local workforce development boards, and subject matter experts in workforce development.(2) (A) The State Department of Developmental Services shall provide staff support and expertise necessary to the board to complete the review and report required by subdivision (a).(B) The State Department of Developmental Services shall identify subject matter experts regarding the workforce issues impacting children and adults served through the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and the California Early Intervention Services Act (Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code).(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2028.